trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix
<pardef n="Mark__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="Smith__np">
  <e> <p><l></l> <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Mediĉ/oj__np">
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="unu__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="du__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>cent</l>      <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>cent</l>      <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="million__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="milion/o_da__num">
  <e>       <p><l>o da</l>      <r>o da<s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oj da</l>     <r>o da<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o da</l>      <r>o da<s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oj da</l>     <r>o da<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on da</l>     <r>o da<s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn da</l>    <r>o da<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="dudek__num">
<!-- per als 21 33 44 etc -->

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>unu</l>   <r><b/>unu</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>du</l>    <r><b/>du</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>tri</l>   <r><b/>tri</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>kvar</l>  <r><b/>kvar</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>kvin</l>  <r><b/>kvin</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ses</l>   <r><b/>ses</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>sep</l>   <r><b/>sep</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ok</l>    <r><b/>ok</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>naŭ</l>   <r><b/>naŭ</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>mi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŝi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ĝi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ni</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ili</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="si__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="probj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>min</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŝin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ĝin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ilin</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="sin">             <i>sin</i><par n="si__prn"/></e>
<e lm="Alexandra">       <i>Alexandra</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anne">            <i>Anne</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barnard">         <i>Barnard</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Blanche">         <i>Blanche</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cecily">          <i>Cecily</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="cent">            <i>cent</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="Cyriac">          <i>Cyriac</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="dek">             <i>dek</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek du">          <i>dek<b/>du</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek kvar">        <i>dek<b/>kvar</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek kvin">        <i>dek<b/>kvin</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek naŭ">         <i>dek<b/>naŭ</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek ok">          <i>dek<b/>ok</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek sep">         <i>dek<b/>sep</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek ses">         <i>dek<b/>ses</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek tri">         <i>dek<b/>tri</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek unu">         <i>dek<b/>unu</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="du">              <i>du</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dudek">           <i>dudek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="Esperaunce">      <i>Esperaunce</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Giles">           <i>Giles</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ivo">             <i>Ivo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kateryn">         <i>Kateryn</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="kvar">            <i>kvar</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvardek">         <i>kvardek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvin">            <i>kvin</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvindek">         <i>kvindek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="Margalida">       <i>Margalida</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="mil">             <i>mil</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="miliono">         <i>miliono</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="Miquel">          <i>Miquel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="naŭ">             <i>naŭ</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="naŭdek">          <i>naŭdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="ok">              <i>ok</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="okdek">           <i>okdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="Pere">            <i>Pere</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rose">            <i>Rose</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="sep">             <i>sep</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="sepdek">          <i>sepdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="ses">             <i>ses</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="sesdek">          <i>sesdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="Thomasyn">        <i>Thomasyn</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="tri">             <i>tri</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="tridek">          <i>tridek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="unu">             <i>unu</i><par n="unu__num"/></e>
<e lm="Babineau">        <i>Babineau</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Blais">           <i>Blais</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bériault">        <i>Bériault</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chiskamish">      <i>Chiskamish</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dandurand">       <i>Dandurand</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Difrancesco">     <i>Difrancesco</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Evoy">            <i>Evoy</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ganley">          <i>Ganley</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gupta">           <i>Gupta</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jarvis">          <i>Jarvis</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lalli">           <i>Lalli</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lewis">           <i>Lewis</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marx">            <i>Marx</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Moniz">           <i>Moniz</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Osullivan">       <i>Osullivan</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ponniah">         <i>Ponniah</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roireau">         <i>Roireau</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sheppard">        <i>Sheppard</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Thurston">        <i>Thurston</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wabanonick">      <i>Wabanonick</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Akhtar">        <i>Akhtar</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Arjona">        <i>Arjona</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bartra">        <i>Bartra</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bota">        <i>Bota</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cañete">        <i>Cañete</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Choque">        <i>Choque</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Curto">        <i>Curto</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Escuín">        <i>Escuín</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fosch">        <i>Fosch</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gran">        <i>Gran</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jofré">        <i>Jofré</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lu">        <i>Lu</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Medialdea">        <i>Medialdea</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Morgades">        <i>Morgades</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Otín">        <i>Otín</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Piñas">        <i>Piñas</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sacristán">        <i>Sacristán</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Torrelles">        <i>Torrelles</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Àlex">           <i>Àlex</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aitor">           <i>Aitor</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Miquel">           <i>Miquel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Áyoub">           <i>Áyoub</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Enzo">           <i>Enzo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Matías">           <i>Matías</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fèlix">           <i>Fèlix</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Yassine">           <i>Yassine</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dennís">           <i>Dennís</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mouad">           <i>Mouad</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Salim">           <i>Salim</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Brahim">           <i>Brahim</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Soufiane">           <i>Soufiane</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Adama">           <i>Adama</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aidan">           <i>Aidan</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Néstor">           <i>Néstor</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hao">           <i>Hao</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tom">           <i>Tom</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ishaq">           <i>Ishaq</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ray">           <i>Ray</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aryan">           <i>Aryan</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jan">           <i>Jan</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maurici">           <i>Maurici</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Telmo">           <i>Telmo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
